Arkansas, session 2025, SB276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-19-605 is amended to read as follows:
27-19-605. Requirements as to policy or bond.
(a) No A policy or bond shall not be effective under § 27-19-604
unless issued by an insurance company or surety company authorized or
eligible to do business in this state except as provided in subsection (b) of
this section, nor unless the policy or bond is subject, if the accident
resulted in bodily injury or death, to a limit, exclusive of interest and
costs, of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) because of
bodily injury or death of one (1) person in any one (1) accident and subject
to said limit for one (1) person, to a limit of not less than fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) because of bodily injury or death of two (2) or more
persons in any one (1) accident, and if the accident has resulted in injury
*ANS253*
02/24/2025 7:45:19 AM ANS253

SB276
to or destruction of property, to a limit of not less than twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000) because of injury to or destruction of property of
others in any one (1) accident.
(b) No A policy or bond shall not be effective under § 27-19-604 with
respect to any vehicle which was not registered in this state or was a
vehicle which was registered elsewhere than in this state at the effective
date of the policy or bond or the most recent renewal thereof, unless the
insurance company or surety company issuing the policy or bond is authorized
or eligible to do business in this state, or if the company is not authorized
to do business in this state, unless it shall execute a power of attorney
authorizing the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration to
accept service on its behalf of notice or process in any action upon the
policy or bond arising out of an accident.
(c) The Office of Driver Services may rely upon the accuracy of the
information in a required report of an accident as to the existence of
insurance or a bond unless and until the Office of Driver Services has reason
to believe that the information is erroneous.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-19-712 is amended to read as follows:
27-19-712. Certificate of insurance as proof.
(a)(1) Proof of financial responsibility for the future may be
furnished by filing with the Office of Driver Services the written
certificate of any insurance carrier duly authorized or eligible to do
business in this state certifying that there is in effect a motor vehicle
liability policy for the benefit of the person required to furnish proof of
financial responsibility.
(2) The certificate shall give the effective date of the motor
vehicle liability policy, which date shall be the same as the effective date
of the certificate, and shall designate by explicit description or by
appropriate reference all vehicles covered thereby, unless the policy is
issued to a person who is not the owner of a motor vehicle.
(b)(1) A nonresident may give proof of financial responsibility by
filing with the Office of Driver Services a written certificate of an
insurance carrier authorized or eligible to transact business in the state in
which the vehicle owned by the nonresident is registered, or in the state in
which the nonresident resides, if he or she does not own a vehicle, provided
02/24/2025 7:45:19 AM ANS253

SB276
the certificate otherwise conforms with the provisions of this subchapter.
(2) The Office of Driver Services shall accept the certificate
upon condition that the insurance carrier complies with the following
provisions with respect to the policies so certified:
(A) The insurance carrier shall execute a power of
attorney authorizing the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration to accept on its behalf service of notice or process in any
action arising out of a motor vehicle accident in this state; and
(B) The insurance carrier shall agree in writing that the
policies shall be deemed to conform with the laws of this state relating to
the terms of motor vehicle liability policies issued therein.
(c) If any insurance carrier not authorized or eligible to transact
business in this state, which has qualified to furnish proof of financial
responsibility, defaults in any such undertakings or agreements, the Office
of Driver Services shall not thereafter accept as proof any certificate of
the carrier, whether theretofore filed or thereafter tendered, as proof, so
long as the default continues.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 27-19-713(a), concerning the definition of
"motor vehicle liability policy", is amended to read as follows:
(a) Certification. As used in this chapter, “motor vehicle liability
policy” means an “owner's policy” or an “operator's policy” of liability
insurance, certified as provided in § 27-19-712 as proof of financial
responsibility for the future, and issued, except as otherwise provided in §
27-19-712 by an insurance carrier duly authorized or eligible to transact
business in this state, to or for the benefit of the person named therein as
insured.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 27-22-104(a)(1), concerning minimum
coverage of motor vehicle insurance required, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) It is unlawful for a person to operate a motor vehicle within
this state unless the motor vehicle and the person's operation of the motor
vehicle are each covered by:
(A) A certificate of self-insurance under § 27-19-107; or
(B) An insurance policy issued by an insurance company
authorized or eligible to do business in this state.
02/24/2025 7:45:19 AM ANS253

SB276

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 27-22-202(4), concerning the definition of
"insurer" used under the Arkansas Online Insurance Verification System Act,
is amended to read as follows:
(4) "Insurer" means a motor vehicle insurance company licensed
or authorized or eligible to do business in this state.






























02/24/2025 7:45:19 AM ANS253